incubator/apertium-tr-az/apertium-tr-az.tr.dix.xml
      <pardef n="besle/mek__vblex">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rim</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>r<b/>miyim</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mem</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mez<b/>miyim</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rsin</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>r<b/>misin</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mezsin</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mez<b/>misin</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>r</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>r<b/>mi</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mez</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mez<b/>mi</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>riz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>r<b/>miyiz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>meyiz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mez<b/>miyiz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rsiniz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>r<b/>misiniz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mezsiniz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mez<b/>misiniz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rler</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rler<b/>mi</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mezler</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mezler<b/>mi</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>



    <pardef n="iç/mek__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erim</l>
          <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ersin</l>
          <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eriz</l>
          <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erler</l>
          <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

      <e lm="içmek"><i>iç</i><par n="iç/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="beslemek"><i>besle</i><par n="besle/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="benimsemek"><i>benimse</i><par n="besle/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="benzemek"><i>benze</i><par n="besle/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="derlemek"><i>derle</i><par n="besle/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="eklemek"><i>ekle</i><par n="besle/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="inlemek"><i>inle</i><par n="besle/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="istemek"><i>iste</i><par n="besle/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="işlemek"><i>işle</i><par n="besle/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="izlemek"><i>izle</i><par n="besle/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="melemek"><i>mele</i><par n="besle/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="ödemek"><i>öde</i><par n="besle/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="özetlemek"><i>özetle</i><par n="besle/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="serinlemek"><i>serinle</i><par n="besle/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="süslemek"><i>süsle</i><par n="besle/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="terlemek"><i>terle</i><par n="besle/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="yüklemek"><i>yükle</i><par n="besle/mek__vblex"/></e>
